California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 33.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

134.

When the term of any license issued by any agency in the department exceeds one year, initial license fees for licenses which are issued during a current license term shall be prorated on a yearly basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1161.)
-------------------------------------------

135.

No agency in the department shall, on the basis of an applicant’s failure to successfully complete prior examinations, impose any additional limitations, restrictions, prerequisites, or requirements on any applicant who wishes to participate in subsequent examinations except that any examining agency which allows an applicant conditional credit for successfully completing a divisible part of an examination may require that an applicant be reexamined in those parts successfully completed if such applicant has not successfully completed all parts of the examination within a required period of time established by the examining agency. Nothing in this section, however, requires the exemption of such applicant from the regular fees and requirements normally associated with examinations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 743.)
-------------------------------------------

135.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a board within the department shall expedite, and may assist, the initial licensure process for an applicant who supplies satisfactory evidence to the board that they have been admitted to the United States as a refugee under Section 1157 of Title 8 of the United States Code, have been granted asylum by the Secretary of Homeland Security or the Attorney General of the United States pursuant to Section 1158 of Title 8 of the United States Code, or they have a special immigrant visa (SIV) that has been granted a status under Section 1244 of Public Law 110-181, under Public Law 109-163, or under Section 602(b) of Title VI of Division F of Public Law 111-8.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed as changing existing licensure requirements. A person applying for expedited licensure under subdivision (a) shall meet all applicable statutory and regulatory licensure requirements.

(c) A board may adopt regulations necessary to administer this section.

(d) For purposes of this section, “applicant” refers to an applicant for an individual license and does not refer to applicants for business or entity licenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 481, Sec. 4.   (SB 1451)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

135.5.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that it is in the best interests of the State of California to provide persons who are not lawfully present in the United States with the state benefits provided by all licensing acts of entities within the department, and therefore enacts this section pursuant to subsection (d) of Section 1621 of Title 8 of the United States Code.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 30, and except as required by subdivision (e) of Section 7583.23, no entity within the department shall deny licensure to an applicant based on his or her citizenship status or immigration status.

(c) Every board within the
 department shall implement all required regulatory or procedural changes necessary to implement this section no later than January 1, 2016. A board may implement the provisions of this section at any time prior to January 1, 2016.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 752, Sec. 2.   (SB 1159)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

136.

(a) Each person holding a license, certificate, registration, permit, or other authority to engage in a profession or occupation issued by a board within the department shall notify the issuing board at its principal office of any change in the person’s mailing address within 30 days after the change, unless the board has specified by regulations a shorter time period.

(b) Except as otherwise provided by law, failure of a licensee to comply with the requirement in subdivision (a) constitutes grounds for the issuance of a citation and administrative fine, if the board has the authority to issue citations and administrative fines.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 34.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

137.

Any agency within the department may promulgate regulations requiring licensees to include their license numbers in any advertising, soliciting, or other presentments to the public.

However, nothing in this section shall be construed to authorize regulation of any person not a licensee who engages in advertising, solicitation, or who makes any other presentment to the public on behalf of a licensee. Such a person shall incur no liability pursuant to this section for communicating in any advertising, soliciting, or other presentment to the public a licensee’s license number exactly as provided by the licensee or for failure to communicate such number if none is provided by the
 licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 35.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

138.

Every board in the department, as defined in Section 22, shall initiate the process of adopting regulations on or before June 30, 1999, to require its licensees, as defined in Section 23.8, to provide notice to their clients or customers that the practitioner is licensed by this state. A board shall be exempt from the requirement to adopt regulations pursuant to this section if the board has in place, in statute or regulation, a requirement that provides for consumer notice of a practitioner’s status as a licensee of this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 36.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

139.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that occupational analyses and examination validation studies are fundamental components of licensure programs. It is the intent of the Legislature that the policy developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) be used by the fiscal, policy, and sunset review committees of the Legislature in their annual reviews of these boards, programs, and bureaus.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department shall develop, in consultation with the boards, programs, bureaus, and divisions under its jurisdiction, and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California and the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, a policy regarding examination development and validation, and
 occupational analysis. The department shall finalize and distribute this policy by September 30, 1999, to each of the boards, programs, bureaus, and divisions under its jurisdiction and to the Osteopathic Medical Board of California and the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners. This policy shall be submitted in draft form at least 30 days prior to that date to the appropriate fiscal, policy, and sunset review committees of the Legislature for review. This policy shall address, but shall not be limited to, the following issues:

(1) An appropriate schedule for examination validation and occupational analyses, and circumstances under which more frequent reviews are appropriate.

(2) Minimum requirements for psychometrically sound examination validation, examination development, and occupational analyses, including standards for sufficient number of test items.

(3) Standards for review of state and national examinations.

(4) Setting of passing standards.

(5) Appropriate funding sources for examination validations and occupational analyses.

(6) Conditions under which boards, programs, and bureaus should use internal and external entities to conduct these reviews.

(7) Standards for determining appropriate costs of reviews of different types of examinations, measured in terms of hours required.

(8) Conditions under which it is appropriate to fund permanent and limited term positions within a board, program, or bureau to manage these reviews.

(c) Every regulatory board and bureau, as defined in Section 22, and every program and bureau administered by the department, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, and the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners, shall submit to the director on or before December 1, 1999, and on or before December 1 of each subsequent year, its method for ensuring that every licensing examination administered by or pursuant to contract with the board is subject to periodic evaluation. The evaluation shall include (1) a description of the occupational analysis serving as the basis for the examination; (2) sufficient item analysis data to permit a psychometric evaluation of the items; (3) an assessment of the appropriateness of prerequisites for admittance to the examination; and (4) an estimate of the costs and personnel required to perform these functions. The evaluation shall be revised and a new evaluation submitted to the director whenever, in the judgment of
 the board, program, or bureau, there is a substantial change in the examination or the prerequisites for admittance to the examination.

(d) The evaluation may be conducted by the board, program, or bureau, the Office of Professional Examination Services of the department, the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, or the State Board of Chiropractic Examiners or pursuant to a contract with a qualified private testing firm. A board, program, or bureau that provides for development or administration of a licensing examination pursuant to contract with a public or private entity may rely on an occupational analysis or item analysis conducted by that entity. The department shall compile this information, along with a schedule specifying when examination validations and occupational analyses shall be performed, and submit it to the appropriate fiscal, policy, and sunset review committees of the Legislature by September 30 of each year. It is the
 intent of the Legislature that the method specified in this report be consistent with the policy developed by the department pursuant to subdivision (b).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 307, Sec. 1.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

139.5.

Beginning July 1, 2021, each board, as defined in Section 22, within the department that issues a license shall do both of the following on at least a quarterly basis:

(a) Prominently display on its internet website one of the following:

(1) The current average timeframes for processing initial and renewal license applications.

(2) The combined current average timeframe for processing both initial and renewal license applications.

(b) Prominently display on its internet website one of the following:

(1) The current average timeframes for processing each license type that the board administers.

(2) The combined current average timeframe for processing all license types that the board administers.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 131, Sec. 1.   (SB 878)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

140.

Any board, as defined in Section 22, which is authorized under this code to take disciplinary action against a person who holds a license may take disciplinary action upon the ground that the licensee has failed to record and preserve for not less than three years, any and all cash transactions involved in the payment of employee wages by a licensee. Failure to make these records available to an authorized representative of the board may be made grounds for disciplinary action. In any action brought and sustained by the board which involves a violation of this section and any regulation adopted thereto, the board may assess the licensee with the actual investigative costs incurred, not to exceed two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500). Failure to pay those costs may result in revocation of the license. Any moneys collected pursuant to this section shall be deposited in the respective fund of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1490, Sec. 2.   Effective September 27, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

141.

(a) For any licensee holding a license issued by a board under the jurisdiction of the department, a disciplinary action taken by another state, by any agency of the federal government, or by another country for any act substantially related to the practice regulated by the California license, may be a ground for disciplinary action by the respective state licensing board. A certified copy of the record of the disciplinary action taken against the licensee by another state, an agency of the federal government, or another country shall be conclusive evidence of the events related therein.

(b) Nothing in this section shall preclude a board from applying a specific statutory provision in the licensing act administered by that board that provides for discipline based upon a disciplinary action taken against the licensee by another state, an agency of the federal government, or another country.

(History: Added by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1275, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

142.

This section shall apply to the bureaus and programs under the direct authority of the director, and to any board that, with the prior approval of the director, elects to have the department administer one or more of the licensing services set forth in this section.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each bureau and program may synchronize the renewal dates of licenses granted to applicants with more than one license issued by the bureau or program. To the extent practicable, fees shall be prorated or adjusted so that no applicant shall be required to pay a greater or lesser fee than he or she would have been required to pay if the change in renewal dates had not occurred.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the abandonment date for an application that has been returned to the applicant as incomplete shall be 12 months from the date of returning the application.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a delinquency, penalty, or late fee shall be assessed if the renewal fee is not postmarked by the renewal expiration date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

143.

(a) No person engaged in any business or profession for which a license is required under this code governing the department or any board, bureau, commission, committee, or program within the department, may bring or maintain any action, or recover in law or equity in any action, in any court of this state for the collection of compensation for the performance of any act or contract for which a license is required without alleging and proving that he or she was duly licensed at all times during the performance of that act or contract, regardless of the merits of the cause of action brought by the person.

(b) The judicial doctrine of substantial compliance shall not apply to this section.

(c) This section shall not apply to an act or contract that is considered to qualify as lawful practice of a licensed occupation or profession pursuant to Section 121.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1207, Sec. 1.5.)
-------------------------------------------

143.5.

(a) No licensee who is regulated by a board, bureau, or program within the Department of Consumer Affairs, nor an entity or person acting as an authorized agent of a licensee, shall include or permit to be included a provision in an agreement to settle a civil dispute, whether the agreement is made before or after the commencement of a civil action, that prohibits the other party in that dispute from contacting, filing a complaint with, or cooperating with the department, board, bureau, or program within the Department of Consumer Affairs that regulates the licensee or that requires the other party to withdraw a complaint from the department, board,
 bureau, or program within the Department of Consumer Affairs that regulates the licensee. A provision of that nature is void as against public policy, and any licensee who includes or permits to be included a provision of that nature in a settlement agreement is subject to disciplinary action by the board, bureau, or program.

(b) Any board, bureau, or program within the Department of Consumer Affairs that takes disciplinary action against a licensee or licensees based on a complaint or report that has also been the subject of a civil action and that has been settled for monetary damages providing for full and final satisfaction of the parties may not require its licensee or licensees to pay any additional sums to the benefit of any plaintiff in the civil
 action.

(c) As used in this section, “board” shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 22, and “licensee” means a person who has been granted a license, as that term is defined in Section 23.7.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, upon granting a petition filed by a licensee or authorized agent of a licensee pursuant to Section 11340.6 of the Government Code, a board, bureau, or program within the Department of Consumer Affairs may, based upon evidence and legal authorities cited in the petition, adopt a regulation that does both of the following:

(1) Identifies a code section or jury instruction in
 a civil cause of action that has no relevance to the board’s, bureau’s, or program’s enforcement responsibilities such that an agreement to settle such a cause of action based on that code section or jury instruction otherwise prohibited under subdivision (a) will not impair the board’s, bureau’s, or program’s duty to protect the public.

(2) Exempts agreements to settle such a cause of action from the requirements of subdivision (a).

(e) This section shall not apply to a licensee subject to Section 2220.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   (AB 2570)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

144.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, an agency designated in subdivision (b) shall require an applicant to furnish to the agency a full set of fingerprints for purposes of conducting criminal history record checks. Any agency designated in subdivision (b) may obtain and receive, at its discretion, criminal history information from the Department of Justice and the United States Federal Bureau of Investigation.

(b) Subdivision (a) applies to the following:

(1) California Board of Accountancy.

(2) State Athletic Commission.

(3) Board of Behavioral Sciences.

(4) Court Reporters Board of California.

(5) Dental Board of California.

(6) California State Board of Pharmacy.

(7) Board of Registered Nursing.

(8) California Veterinary Medical Board.

(9) Board of Vocational Nursing and Psychiatric Technicians of the State of California.

(10) Respiratory Care Board of California.

(11) Physical Therapy Board of California.

(12) Physician Assistant Board.

(13) Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology and Hearing Aid Dispensers Board.

(14) Medical Board of California.

(15) California State Board of Optometry.

(16) Acupuncture Board.

(17) Cemetery and Funeral Bureau.

(18) Bureau of Security and Investigative Services.

(19) Division of Investigation.

(20) Board of Psychology.

(21) California Board of Occupational Therapy.

(22) Structural Pest Control Board.

(23) Contractors State License Board.

(24) California Board of Naturopathic Medicine.

(25) Professional Fiduciaries Bureau.

(26) Board for Professional Engineers, Land Surveyors, and Geologists.

(27) Podiatric Medical Board of California.

(28) Osteopathic Medical Board of California.

(29) California Architects Board, beginning January 1, 2021.

(30) Landscape Architects Technical Committee, beginning January 1, 2022.

(31) Bureau of Household Goods and Services with respect to household movers as described in Chapter 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8.

(32) State Board of Chiropractic Examiners.

(c) For purposes of paragraph (26) of subdivision (b), the term “applicant” shall be limited to an initial applicant who has never been registered or licensed by the board or to an applicant for a new licensure or registration category.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 2.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

144.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, a board described in Section 144 may request, and is authorized to receive, from a local or state agency certified records of all arrests and convictions, certified records regarding probation, and any and all other related documentation needed to complete an applicant or licensee investigation. A local or state agency may provide those records to the board upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 516, Sec. 1.   (SB 305)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

144.6.

(a) For purposes of Section 668.14 of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations, the required minimum number of hours, or the equivalent, established in this state for education programs that qualify persons for any license issued by a board within the department shall be equal to the number of clock or credit hours, or the equivalent, that the education program provides as of the effective date of this section.

(b) For an education program approved by a board within the department as of the effective date of this section that submits to the applicable board, no later than July 1, 2026, a request to modify the program to reduce the program clock or credit hours, or the equivalent, the applicable board shall, no later than January 1, 2027,
 complete its review of the requested modification.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 41, Sec. 1.   (SB 164)   Effective June 29, 2024.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

144.7.

(a) For purposes of any code or statute, a national or regional accrediting agency recognized by the United States Department of Education as of January 1, 2025, shall retain that recognition until July 1, 2029, provided that the accrediting agency continues to operate in substantially the same manner as it did on January 1, 2025.

(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2030, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 425, Sec. 1.   (SB 744)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2030, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 1.5. Unlicensed Activity Enforcement [145. - 149.]

145.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) Unlicensed activity in the professions and vocations regulated by the Department of Consumer Affairs is a threat to the health, welfare, and safety of the people of the State of California.

(b) The law enforcement agencies of the state should have sufficient, effective, and responsible means available to enforce the licensing laws of the state.

(c) The criminal sanction for unlicensed activity should be swift, effective, appropriate, and create a strong incentive to obtain a license.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

146.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a violation of any code section listed in subdivision (c) is an infraction subject to the procedures described in Sections 19.6 and 19.7 of the Penal Code when either of the following applies:

(1) A complaint or a written notice to appear in court pursuant to Chapter 5C (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code is filed in court charging the offense as an infraction unless the defendant, at the time they are arraigned, after being advised of their rights, elects to have the case proceed as a misdemeanor.

(2) The court, with the consent of the defendant and the prosecution, determines that the offense is an infraction in which
 event the case shall proceed as if the defendant has been arraigned on an infraction complaint.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to a violation of the code sections listed in subdivision (c) if the defendant has had their license, registration, or certificate previously revoked or suspended.

(c) The following sections require registration, licensure, certification, or other authorization in order to engage in certain businesses or professions regulated by this code:

(1) Section 2474.

(2) Sections 2052 and 2054.

(3) Section 2570.3.

(4) Section 2630.

(5) Section
 2903.

(6) Section 3575.

(7) Section 3660.

(8) Sections 3760 and 3761.

(9) Section 4080.

(10) Section 4825.

(11) Section 4935.

(12) Section 4980.

(13) Section 4989.50.

(14) Section 4996.

(15) Section 4999.30.

(16) Section 5536.

(17) Section
 6530 or 6532.

(18) Section 6704.

(19) Section 6980.10.

(20) Section 7317.

(21) Section 7502 or 7592.

(22) Section 7520.

(23) Section 7574.10.

(24) Section 7574.12.

(25) Section 7582. 

(26) Section 7617 or 7641.

(27) Subdivision (a) of Section 7872.

(28) Section 8016.

(29) Section 8505.

(30) Section 8725.

(31) Section 9681.

(32) Section 9840.

(33) Subdivision (c) of Section 9891.24.

(34) Section 19049.

(d) Notwithstanding any other law, a violation of any of the sections listed in subdivision (c), which is an infraction, is punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000). No portion of the minimum fine may be suspended by the court unless as a condition of that suspension the defendant is required to submit proof of a current valid license, registration, or
 certificate for the profession or vocation that was the basis for their conviction.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 2.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

147.

(a) Any employee designated by the director shall have the authority to issue a written notice to appear in court pursuant to Chapter 5c (commencing with Section 853.5) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code. Employees so designated are not peace officers and are not entitled to safety member retirement benefits, as a result of such designation. The employee’s authority is limited to the issuance of written notices to appear for infraction violations of provisions of this code and only when the violation is committed in the presence of the employee.

(b) There shall be no civil liability on the part of, and no cause of action shall arise against, any person, acting pursuant to subdivision (a) and within the scope of his or her authority, for false arrest or false imprisonment arising out of any arrest which is lawful or which the person, at the time of such arrest, had reasonable cause to believe was lawful.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

148.

Any board, bureau, or commission within the department may, in addition to the administrative citation system authorized by Section 125.9, also establish, by regulation, a similar system for the issuance of an administrative citation to an unlicensed person who is acting in the capacity of a licensee or registrant under the jurisdiction of that board, bureau, or commission. The administrative citation system authorized by this section shall meet the requirements of Section 125.9 and may not be applied to an unlicensed person who is otherwise exempted from the provisions of the applicable licensing act. The establishment of an administrative citation system for unlicensed activity does not preclude the use of other enforcement statutes for unlicensed activities at the discretion of the board, bureau, or commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1135, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

149.

(a) If, upon investigation, an agency designated in Section 101 has probable cause to believe that a person is advertising with respect to the offering or performance of services, without being properly licensed by or registered with the agency to offer or perform those services, the agency may issue a citation under Section 148 containing an order of correction that requires the violator to do both of the following:

(1) Cease the unlawful advertising.

(2) Notify the telephone company furnishing services to the violator to disconnect the telephone service furnished to any telephone number contained in the unlawful advertising.

(b) This action is stayed if the person to whom a citation is issued under subdivision (a) notifies the agency in writing that he or she intends to contest the citation. The agency shall afford an opportunity for a hearing, as specified in Section 125.9.

(c) If the person to whom a citation and order of correction is issued under subdivision (a) fails to comply with the order of correction after that order is final, the agency shall inform the Public Utilities Commission of the violation and the Public Utilities Commission shall require the telephone corporation furnishing services to that person to disconnect the telephone service furnished to any telephone number contained in the unlawful advertising.

(d) The good faith compliance by a telephone corporation with an order of the Public Utilities Commission to terminate
 service issued pursuant to this section shall constitute a complete defense to any civil or criminal action brought against the telephone corporation arising from the termination of service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 395, Sec. 2.   (SB 1243)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. The Director of Consumer Affairs [150. - 166.]

150.

The department is under the control of a civil executive officer who is known as the Director of Consumer Affairs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 716.)
-------------------------------------------

151.

The director is appointed by the Governor and holds office at the Governor’s pleasure. The director shall receive the annual salary provided for by Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 11550) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the director’s necessary traveling expenses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 38.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

152.

For the purpose of administration, the reregistration and clerical work of the department is organized by the director, subject to the approval of the Governor, in such manner as the director deems necessary to properly segregate and conduct the work of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 370, Sec. 2.   (SB 1371)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

152.5.

For purposes of distributing the reregistration work of the department uniformly throughout the year as nearly as practicable, the boards in the department may, with the approval of the director, extend by not more than six months the date fixed by law for the renewal of any license, certificate or permit issued by them, except that in such event any renewal fee which may be involved shall be prorated in such manner that no person shall be required to pay a greater or lesser fee than would have been required had the change in renewal dates not occurred.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 1707.)
-------------------------------------------

152.6.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, each board within the department shall, in cooperation with the director, establish such license periods and renewal dates for all licenses in such manner as best to distribute the renewal work of all boards throughout each year and permit the most efficient, and economical use of personnel and equipment. To the extent practicable, provision shall be made for the proration or other adjustment of fees in such manner that no person shall be required to pay a greater or lesser fee than the person would have been required to pay if the change in license periods or renewal dates had not occurred.

As used in this section “license” includes
 “certificate,” “permit,” “authority,” “registration,” and similar indicia of authority to engage in a business or profession, and “board” includes “board,” “bureau,” “commission,” “committee,” and an individual who is authorized to renew a license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 40.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

153.

The director may investigate the work of the boards in the department and may obtain a copy of all records and full and complete data in all official matters in possession of the boards and their members, officers, or employees, other than examination questions prior to submission to applicants at scheduled examinations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 351, Sec. 41.   (AB 496)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

153.5.

In the event that a newly authorized board replaces an existing or a previous board, the director may appoint an interim executive officer for the board who shall serve temporarily until the new board appoints a permanent executive officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1079, Sec. 1.   Effective September 29, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

154.

Any and all matters relating to employment, tenure or discipline of employees of any board, agency or commission, shall be initiated by said board, agency or commission, but all such actions shall, before reference to the State Personnel Board, receive the approval of the appointing power.

To effect the purposes of Division 1 of this code and each agency of the department, employment of all personnel shall be in accord with Article XXIV of the Constitution, the law and rules and regulations of the State Personnel Board. Each board, agency or commission, shall select its employees from a list of eligibles obtained by the appointing power from the State Personnel Board. The person selected by the board, agency or commission to fill any position or vacancy shall thereafter be reported by the board, agency or commission, to the appointing power.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1276.)
-------------------------------------------

154.1.

(a) The Legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:

(1) The department is currently providing opportunities for employees of agencies comprising the department who perform enforcement functions to attend an entry level enforcement academy.

(2) It is in the best interest of consumers in the state for the department to continue to provide ongoing training opportunities for employees performing enforcement functions for each agency comprising the department.

(b) The department shall continue to develop and make available training courses for employees who perform
 enforcement functions. The purpose of the training courses is to develop knowledge of enforcement practices for all employees who perform enforcement functions. The department shall encourage an agency executive officer, registrar, executive director, bureau chief, enforcement manager, supervisor, or staff member to attend enforcement training courses.

(c) The department shall develop the enforcement training curricula in consultation and cooperation with the office of the Attorney General and the Office of Administrative Hearings.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 395, Sec. 3.   (SB 1243)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

154.2.

(a) The healing arts boards within Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) may employ individuals, other than peace officers, to perform investigative services.

(b) The healing arts boards within Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) may employ individuals to serve as experts.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 719, Sec. 1.   (SB 856)   Effective October 19, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

154.3.

(a) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the department shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for an employee, prospective employee, contractor, subcontractor, or volunteer. The Department of Justice shall provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(b) Pursuant to subdivision (u) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code, the department shall submit to the Department of Justice fingerprint images and related information required by the Department of Justice for all peace officer employees and prospective peace officer employees of the department. The Department of Justice shall
 provide a state- or federal-level response pursuant to subdivision (k) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 997, Sec. 1.   (AB 179)   Effective September 30, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

154.5.

If a person, not a regular employee of a board under this code, including the Board of Chiropractic Examiners and the Osteopathic Medical Board of California, is hired or under contract to provide expertise to the board in the evaluation of an applicant or the conduct of a licensee, and that person is named as a defendant in a civil action arising out of the evaluation or any opinions rendered, statements made, or testimony given to the board or its representatives, the board shall provide for representation required to defend the defendant in that civil action. The board shall not be liable for any judgment rendered against the person. The Attorney General shall be utilized in the action and his or her services shall be a charge against the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 359, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

155.

(a) In accordance with Section 159.5, the director may employ such investigators, inspectors, and deputies as are necessary properly to investigate and prosecute all violations of any law, the enforcement of which is charged to the department or to any board, agency, or commission in the department.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that inspectors used by boards, bureaus, or commissions in the department shall not be required to be employees of the Division of Investigation, but may either be employees of, or under contract to, the boards, bureaus, or commissions. Contracts for services shall be consistent with Article 4.5 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 6 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. All civil service employees currently employed as inspectors whose functions are transferred as a result of this section shall retain their positions, status, and rights in accordance with Section 19994.10 of the Government Code and the State Civil Service Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 18500) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(c) Nothing in this section limits the authority of, or prohibits, investigators in the Division of Investigation in the conduct of inspections or investigations of any licensee, or in the conduct of investigations of any officer or employee of a board or the department at the specific request of the director or his or her designee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1382, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

156.
